DI-50 DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

DI6GN-05

CIRCUIT INSPECTION

DTC C 1246 / 46 Master Cylinder Pressure Sensor
Circuit
CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

Eitherofthefollowing 1.,2.,3.,4.0r5.isdetected:

1. Atthe vehicle speed of 7 km/h (4 mph) or more, ECU
terminal PMC voltage becomes more than 0.86 V and
theconditionthat0.0 1 Vorlessdoesnotchangecon-
tinues for 30 sec.

2. Interference occurs to ECU terminal PMC 7 times or
more for 5 sec.

3.ECUterminal STPis OFF, and the condition that termi- * Mastercylinder pressure sensor
nal PMC voltage becomes morethan 0.86 V orless than » Master cylinder pressure sensor circuit
0.3 V continues for 5 sec. or more.

4.TheconditionthatECUterminalIG 1 voltageis9.5Vto
17.0V, and terminal VCM voltage other thantherange
from4.4Vt05.6V continues for 1.2sec.ormore.

5. The condition that ECU terminal VCM voltage is 4.4 V to
5.6 V, and terminal PMC voltage other than the range
from0. 14V104.85V continues for 1.2sec.ormore.

C1246/46

Fail safe function:
If trouble occurs in the master cylinder pressure sensor circuit, the ECU cuts off current to the ABS solenoid
relay and prohibits ABS & BA & TRC & VSC controls and the brake system becomes normal.
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DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) & DI-51
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

HINT:
Starttheinspectionfromstep 1 incaseofusingthehand -heldtesterand startfromstep2incase of not
usingthehand -heldtester.

1 Check output value ofthe master cylinder pressure sensor.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connectthehand -heldtestertothe DLCS.
(b) Turntheignition switch ON and push the hand -heldtester main switch ON.
(c) Selectthe DATALIST mode onthe hand -heldtester.
CHECK:
Checkthatthe brake fluid pressure value of the master cylinder pressure sensor displayed on the hand -held
tester is changing when depressing the brake pedal.
OK:
Brake fluid pressure value must be changing.

0K> Go to step 4.
NG \

2 [ Check master cylinder pressure sensor.

PREPARATION:
(@) Install LSPV gauge to the front caliper bleeder plug por-
tion, and bleed LSPV gauge.
SST09709 -29018
Q (b) Remove air cleaner inlet and battery clamp cover.
CHECK:
Start the engine and depress the brake pedal, then check the
relation between the fluid pressure and voltage of PMC and E2
rzo0|  terminals ofthe master cylinder pressure sensor with connector
still connected.

OK:
Front brake caliper fluid pressure Voltage
0kPa (0Kgflom ,0psi) 0.37 - 0.63V
5,883kPa (60kgficm ,853psi) 1.57 - 1.83V
11,768kPa( 120kgf/om , 1,706psi) 2.77 - 3.03V
HINT:
Voltage of betweenterminalsVCMand E2: 4.7 -5.3V

NG> Replace master cylinder pressure sensor.
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DI-52 DIAGNOSTICS - ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

3 | Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between master cyl-
inder pressure sensor and ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU (See page IN-35).

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
~_—

4 [ Check whether or not the ECU terminal STP input voltage is changed when the
stop light switch is turned on and off.

RM731EonpageDIl -82).

NO> Check the stop light switch circuit (See Pub. No.

YES

Check and replace ABS & BA & TRC & VSC
ECU.
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